North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-02 Department to Register Motor Vehicles

39-02-01.
Registrar of motor vehicles — Appointment — Term — Removal — Oath — Bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

39-02-02.
Salary and expenses of registrar. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

39-02-03.
Powers and duties of director and department.

The director may adopt and enforce such administrative rules, designate such agencies, and establish such branch offices, including contracted branch offices, as may be necessary to carry out the motor vehicle and driver’s license laws applicable to the director’s office and department. The director shall provide suitable motor vehicle and driver’s license forms and equipment requisite for the operation of the director’s office and department, and shall prepay all transportation charges thereon. Branch office contracts entered under this section may extend five years and may be renewed in accordance with this section. At least one year before the end of each branch office contract term, the department shall consider entering contracts with new branch office vendors. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may enter direct negotiations and contract with qualified vendors to provide branch office services. The director may provide for a maximum fee schedule for the various services provided by the branch offices, not to exceed ten dollars for each service provided. Any branch office may establish a different fee schedule if the schedule does not contain a fee that exceeds a maximum fee established by the director and is approved by the director. All branch office managers must be bonded. The department may lease or provide office space or other costs as necessary to independent motor vehicle branch managers. All rents collected under this section must be deposited in the state highway fund. The department and the officers thereof shall enforce the provisions of all laws pertaining to the director and the department.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 39-0203; S.L. 1951, ch. 236, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 39-0203; S.L. 1967, ch. 294, § 1; 1975, ch. 323, § 1; 2005, ch. 323, § 1; 2011, ch. 41, § 24; 2013, ch. 43, § 13; 2015, ch. 12, § 17, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 281, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 17 of chapter 12, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 21 of chapter 12, S.L. 2015 provides,

“APPLICATION.

Section 17 of this Act (which amended this section) applies to applicable contracts, regardless of whether entered before or after the effective date of this Act.”

39-02-03.1.
Director to provide notice and opportunity for hearing prior to cancellation, revocation, suspension, or rescission of a motor vehicle registration or a certificate of title to a motor vehicle.

Whenever, under the laws pertaining to the cancellation, revocation, suspension, or rescission of a registration of a motor vehicle or a certificate of title to a motor vehicle, a determination has been made to cancel, revoke, suspend, or rescind either the registration or certificate of title, or both, the director shall provide the legal and registered owner with notice of such cancellation, revocation, suspension, or rescission and the opportunity for a hearing. Such notice must be sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than ten days prior to the effective date of the cancellation, revocation, suspension, or rescission.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 324, § 1.

39-02-04.
Office of registrar open for licenses and information — Time. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 25.

39-02-05.
(See note for contingent expiration of amendment) Records of the department open to public inspection.

Except as provided by chapter 39-33, all registration and license records in the office of the department must be public records and must be open to inspection by the public during business hours. The director shall charge a uniform fee, not to exceed three dollars, for each item of information furnished to any person concerning a specific motor vehicle. However, such charges may not be assessed to a person requesting information concerning a motor vehicle of which that person is the owner, nor may such charges apply to law enforcement officials requesting motor vehicle information in their official capacity. All fees received under the provisions of this section must be credited to the highway tax distribution fund.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 39-0205; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 2; 1991, ch. 397, § 1; 1997, ch. 349, § 11; 2007, ch. 316, § 2.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 349, S.L. 1997, amended this section by substituting “Except as provided by chapter 39-33, all” for “All”, at the beginning of the section. The amendment by section 11 is subject to the contingent expiration date provided in section 12 of chapter 349, S.L. 1997.

Section 12 of chapter 349, S.L. 1997 provides:

“

EXPIRATION DATE.

This Act becomes ineffective on the date the attorney general certifies to the legislative council that the Federal Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994 [Pub. L. 103-322; 108 Stat. 2099; 18 USCS 2721] has been declared unconstitutional by the United States Supreme Court or is otherwise void.”

Cross-References.

Abstracts of motorists’ driving records, access to, see §§ 39-16-03, 39-16-03.1.

Access to public records, see § 44-04-18.

Collateral References.

Right to inspect motor vehicle records, 84 A.L.R.2d 1261.

39-02-06.
Records of stolen or recovered motor vehicles to be furnished certain officials and departments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-02-07.
Penalty for violation of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.